Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-294
Township organization;
discontinuance; election; ballot; form.

(1) If the petition
or county board resolution to discontinue township organization specifies
a five-member county board of commissioners pursuant to section 23-293, the
questions on the ballot shall be respectively: For
discontinuance of township organization and creation of a five-member county
board of commissioners; or
Against changing to a commissioner form of county government.

(2) If the petition or county board resolution to discontinue township
organization specifies a seven-member county board of commissioners pursuant
to section 23-293, the questions on the ballot shall be respectively: For discontinuance of township organization and creation of
a seven-member county board of commissioners;
or Against changing to a commissioner form of county government.

(3) Elections shall be conducted regarding discontinuance of township
organization as provided in the Election Act.

Laws 1885, c. 43, § 3, p. 236;

R.S.1913, § 1058;

C.S.1922, § 960;

C.S.1929, § 26-274;

R.S.1943, § 23-294;

Laws 2008, LB269, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB434, § 2.

Election Act, see section 32-101.